Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2257.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 710. Screening Requirements.--(a) The department, in consultation with each county agency as defined in 67 Pa.C.S. § 7101 (relating to definitions), shall develop a trauma-informed screening to identify a child who is a victim of, or at risk of becoming a victim of, human trafficking involving sexual servitude as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3001 (relating to definitions).(b) A county agency shall administer the screening under subsection (a) to a child alleged to be a dependent child as 123456789101112131415161718 defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 6302 (relating to definitions) with whom the county agency has contact.(c) If a county agency identifies a child under subsection (a) as a victim of, or at risk of becoming a victim of, human trafficking involving sexual servitude, the county agency shall connect the child with specialized programs and services available under 18 Pa.C.S. § 3062 (relating to specialized services for sexually exploited children).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20260HB2257PN2954 - 2 - 123456789